New Jersey, session 222, S1150.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in this act: a.     "Domestic violence" means the occurrence of one or more of the following acts inflicted upon a person protected under this act by an adult or an emancipated minor: (1)   Homicide, N.J.S.2C:11-1 et seq.; (2)   Assault, N.J.S.2C:12-1; (3)   Terroristic threats, N.J.S.2C:12-3; (4)   Kidnapping, N.J.S.2C:13-1; (5)   Criminal restraint, N.J.S.2C:13-2; (6)   False imprisonment, N.J.S.2C:13-3; (7)   Sexual assault, N.J.S.2C:14-2; (8)   Criminal sexual contact, N.J.S.2C:14-3; (9)   Lewdness, N.J.S.2C:14-4; (10)  Criminal mischief, N.J.S.2C:17-3; (11)  Burglary, N.J.S.2C:18-2; (12)  Criminal trespass, N.J.S.2C:18-3; (13)  Harassment, N.J.S.2C:33-4; (14)  Stalking, P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10) ; (15)  Criminal coercion, N.J.S.2C:13-5; (16)  Robbery, N.J.S.2C:15-1; (17) Contempt of a domestic violence order pursuant to subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:29-9 that constitutes a crime or disorderly persons offense; (18)  Any other crime involving risk of death or serious bodily injury to a person protected under the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et al.); (19)  Cyber-harassment, P.L.2013, c.272 (C.2C:33-4.1); (20)  Any other offense involving psychological abuse that causes fear or serious alarm or distress that has a substantial adverse impact on a persons daily activities; or (21)  Economic abuse. As used in this paragraph, economic abuse means any behavior that has a substantial adverse effect on the ability of a person protected under this act to: (a) acquire, use, or maintain money or other property, or (b) obtain goods or services. When one or more of these acts is inflicted by an unemancipated minor upon a person protected under this act, the occurrence shall not constitute "domestic violence," but may be the basis for the filing of a petition or complaint pursuant to the provisions of section 11 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-30). b.    "Law enforcement agency" means a department, division, bureau, commission, board or other authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof which employs law enforcement officers. c.     "Law enforcement officer" means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, apprehension, arrest and conviction of offenders against the laws of this State. d.    "Victim of domestic violence" means a person protected under this act and shall include any person who is 18 years of age or older or who is an emancipated minor and who has been subjected to domestic violence by a spouse, former spouse, or any other person who is a present household member or was at any time a household member. "Victim of domestic violence" also includes any person, regardless of age, who has been subjected to domestic violence by a person with whom the victim has a child in common, or with whom the victim anticipates having a child in common, if one of the parties is pregnant.  "Victim of domestic violence" also includes any person who has been subjected to domestic violence by a person with whom the victim has had a dating relationship. e.     "Emancipated minor" means a person who is under 18 years of age but who has been married, has entered military service, has a child or is pregnant or has been previously declared by a court or an administrative agency to be emancipated. (cf: P.L.2016, c.77, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.